Utah statutes.
70C-7-102.   No garnishment before judgment.

Prior to entry of judgment in an action against a debtor relating to a consumer credit agreement, the creditor may not attach unpaid earnings of the debtor by garnishment or like proceedings.



Enacted by Chapter 159, 1985 General Session

